New York, session 2025-2026, A7503.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 360-a to read as follows: 3 § 360-a. Yonkers toll plaza discontinued. The authority shall discon- 4 tinue and remove the Yonkers toll plaza on the New York state thruway. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 6 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10723-01-5